District of Columbia statutes.
38-1415

Grants from Secretary of Education — Payment.

Grants under § 38-1412 may be paid in advance or by way of reimbursement at such intervals as the Secretary may find necessary and with appropriate adjustments on account of overpayments or underpayments previously made.

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1934, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 306
1981 Ed., § 31-1715.
1973 Ed., § 31-925.